District of Columbia statutes.
24-464

Medical parole.

(a)

The Department shall identify permanently incapacitated and terminally ill inmates for consideration for medical parole based solely on medical documentation. The Department shall forward an application and documentation in support of parole eligibility to the Board within 15 days of receipt of an application. The documentation shall include information concerning the inmate’s medical history and prognosis, institutional behavior and adjustment, and criminal history. The inmate or inmate’s representative may submit an application to the Board.

(b)

Whenever it shall appear to the Board that because of a medical condition an inmate is permanently incapacitated or terminally ill, and the inmate’s parole is not incompatible with the welfare of society, the Board may authorize the inmate’s release on medical parole upon terms and conditions as the Board shall from time to time prescribe.

(c)

The Board shall make a determination whether to grant medical parole within 15 days of receipt of an application and supporting documentation from the Department.

History

May 15, 1993, D.C. Law 9-271, § 5, 40 DCR 792

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 24-264.